Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRUNK HIGHWAY 65 CONSTRUCTION MITIGATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Qualified business" means a business that employs up to 40 full-time or part-time employees and experiences substantial business impacts as a result of the project. new text end new text begin (d) "Substantial business impacts" means impairment of road access, parking, or visibility for one or more qualified businesses as a result of the project, for a minimum period of one month. new text end new text begin (e) "Trunk Highway 65 construction project" or "project" means the construction work to improve intersections along marked Trunk Highway 65 in the city of Blaine at 99th Avenue Northeast; 105th Avenue Northeast; Anoka County State-Aid Highway 12, known as 109th Avenue Northeast; and 117th Avenue Northeast, including the associated frontage roads and backage roads within the trunk highway system. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of transportation, must award grants to qualified businesses that are negatively affected by the Trunk Highway 65 construction project for the purpose of maintaining the businesses during the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant awards. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must prioritize the awarding of each grant on a case-by-case basis, including but not limited to the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) rate of decline in revenue; new text end new text begin (2) duration of construction; new text end new text begin (3) proximity to construction; new text end new text begin (4) severity of traffic disruption; and new text end new text begin (5) lack of access for pedestrian traffic. new text end new text begin (b) When determining grant awards, the commissioner must consult with the commissioner of transportation and with the business liaison designated for the project under Minnesota Statutes, section 160.165. new text end new text begin (c) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for employee payroll expenses, operating expenses, or facilities expenses. Grant awards must not be used for bonuses; new equipment, furniture, or capital improvements; or construction or expansion. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter on January 15 until the project is completed, the commissioner must submit a report on the grants awarded under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over employment and economic development and transportation finance and policy. At a minimum, the report must include a complete list of grants awarded in the previous calendar year, including business names and addresses, types of businesses, and the amount of each award. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the grant awards under section 1. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may retain up to two percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end